Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 10 Uninsured Motor Vehicle Coverage

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 190 to 193; 8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 431 to 436.

Rights and liabilities under “uninsured motorists” coverage, 79 ALR2d 1252.

Validity and enforceability of provision for binding arbitration and waiver thereof, 24 ALR3d 1325.

Reduction of coverage by amounts payable under medical expense insurance, 24 ALR3d 1353.

What constitutes an “uninsured” or “unknown” vehicle or motorist, within uninsured motorist coverage, 26 ALR3d 883, 24 ALR4th 13, 24 ALR4th 63.

Coverage of claim for wrongful death of insured, 26 ALR3d 935.

Validity and construction of “other insurance” provisions, 28 ALR3d 551.

Time limitations as to claims based on uninsured motorist clause, 28 ALR3d 580.

What issues are arbitrable under arbitration provision of uninsured motorist insurance, 29 ALR3d 328.

Construction of statutory provision governing rejection or waiver of uninsured motorist coverage, 55 ALR3d 216.

What constitutes “automobile” for purposes of uninsured motorist provisions, 65 ALR3d 851.

Coverage under uninsured motorist clause of injury inflicted intentionally, 72 ALR3d 1161.

Insured's right to bring direct action against insurer for uninsured motorist benefits, 73 ALR3d 632.

Conflict of laws as to right of insured to maintain under uninsured motorist clause a direct action against automobile liability insurer, 83 ALR3d 308.

Automobile liability policy: choice of law as to validity of “other insurance” clause of uninsured motorist coverage, 83 ALR3d 321.

Applicability of uninsured motorist statutes to self-insurers, 27 ALR4th 1266.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in policies issued by different insurers to different insureds, 28 ALR4th 362.

Right of insurer issuing “uninsured motorist” coverage to intervene in action by insured against uninsured motorist, 35 ALR4th 757.

When statute of limitations commences to run on automobile no-fault insurance personal injury claim, 36 ALR4th 357.

Cancellation of compulsory or “financial responsibility” automobile insurance, 44 ALR4th 13.

Punitive damages as within coverage of uninsured or underinsured motorist insurance, 54 ALR4th 1186.

Right of insured, precluded from recovering against owner or operator of uninsured motor vehicle because of governmental immunity, to recover uninsured motorist benefits, 55 ALR4th 806.

What constitutes “entering” or “alighting from” vehicle within meaning of insurance policy, or statute mandating insurance coverage, 59 ALR4th 149.

Validity and construction of automobile insurance provision or statute automatically terminating coverage when insured obtains another policy providing similar coverage, 61 ALR4th 1130.

Uninsured motorist coverage: “legally entitled to recover” clause as barring claim compensable under workers' compensation statute, 82 ALR4th 1096.

Insured's recovery of uninsured motorist claim against insurer as affecting subsequent recovery against tortfeasors causing injury, 3 ALR5th 746.

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage: validity, construction and effect of policy provision purporting to reduce coverage by amount paid or payable under workers' compensation law, 31 ALR5th 116.

Right of employer or workers' compensation carrier to lien against, or reimbursement out of, uninsured or underinsured motorist proceeds payable to employee injured by third party, 33 ALR5th 587.

Validity and construction of provision of uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage that damages under the coverage will be reduced by amount of recovery from tortfeasor, 40 ALR5th 603.

Automobile insurance coverage for drive-by shootings and other incidents involving the intentional discharge of firearms from moving motor vehicles, 41 ALR5th 91.

No-fault insurance coverage for injury or death of insured occurring during carjacking or attempted carjacking, 42 ALR5th 727.

61A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 1285 to 1294.

§ 31-10-101.
Required coverage; rejection.

No policy insuring against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury or death suffered by any natural person arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state with respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this state unless coverage is provided therein or supplemental thereto, in limits for bodily injury or death as provided by W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi), under provisions approved by the insurance commissioner for the protection of persons insured thereunder or legally entitled to recover damages from owners or operators of uninsured motor vehicles because of bodily injury, sickness or disease, including death resulting therefrom. The named insured may reject the coverage. Unless the named insured requests the coverage in writing, the coverage need not be provided in or supplemental to a renewal policy where the named insured had rejected the coverage in connection with the policy previously issued to him by the same insurer.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 81, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-315.1; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Applicability. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

31-10-101

and -102 unambiguously did not require the insured to obtain, or insurers to provide, underinsured motorist liability coverage; the insurer's policy did not contain such coverage, and disallowed changes in its terms, and the policy could not be reformed to provide such coverage.
Broderick v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 2012 WY 22, 270 P.3d 684,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2012).

Section construed to subserve socially desirable legislativepolicy. —

This section was designed to furnish protection by insurance for victims of uninsured motorists, and for the supreme court to refuse to construe the statute literally when such a construction will subserve the socially desirable policy of adequate indemnification of innocent automobile accident victims would be to ignore the legislative mandate and its purpose. Ramsour v. Grange Ins. Ass'n, 541 P.2d 35,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1975).

Good faith and fair dealing required. —

An insurer providing uninsured motorist coverage under this section owes a duty of good faith and fair dealing to the insured at all times. Accepting this proposition acknowledges the unequal bargaining power and reasonable expectations of the insured seeking indemnification under terms of uninsured motorist coverage. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Shrader, 882 P.2d 813,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1994).

Direct action against insurance company permitted. —

As a matter of public policy, the fault of the uninsured motorist and the amount of damages suffered by the insured may be determined in a direct action against the insurer. Therefore, the district court did not commit an error of law in permitting the plaintiffs to institute a direct action against insurance company prior to a determination of the uninsured motorist's liability. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co. v. Shrader, 882 P.2d 813,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1994).

Maximum recovery not limited to minimum limit of 1 policy.—

This section states that every policy of insurance that is issued shall be in the amount of the statutory minimum. It does not say that if there is more than one policy covering the insured, that the maximum to be paid would be the minimum limit of one policy. Ramsour v. Grange Ins. Ass'n, 541 P.2d 35,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1975).

Escape clauses limiting recovery invalid. —

“Other insurance” escape clauses are invalid to extent that they limit total recovery to less than or equal to actual damage within policy limits. Ramsour v. Grange Ins. Ass'n, 541 P.2d 35,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1975).

“Stacking” of insurance provisions not permitted. —

An insured, under a single automobile insurance policy encompassing several vehicles, was not permitted to “stack” or “pyramid” uninsured-motorists and medical-payment provisions for recovery of injury and medical expenses sustained in an accident involving one of the covered vehicles, where the right to aggregate coverages was neither required by ascertainable public-policy concerns nor permitted by the insurance policy by its clearly stated terms. Commercial Union Ins. Co. v. Stamper, 732 P.2d 534,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1987).

Injuries sustained from instrumentalities other than motorizedvehicles. —

Insurance carriers are not required to be answerable under the uninsured motorist coverage mandated by statute for injuries sustained from instrumentalities other than motorized vehicles, i.e., for injuries inflicted by gun, knife, club, fist, etc. during an intentional criminal assault. Ulrich v. United Servs. Auto. Ass'n, 839 P.2d 942,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

Allstate Ins. Co. v. Wyoming Ins. Dep't, 672 P.2d 810,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1983); Farmers Ins. Exch. v. Williams, 823 F. Supp. 927, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21353 (D. Wyo. 1992).

Cited

in

Wyoming Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Allstate Indem. Co., 844 P.2d 464,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconciliation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Entitlement of child, spouse, parent or other person to survivor's loss benefit under no-fault insurance acts, 12 ALR4th 975.

Operation or use of vehicle outside scope of permission as rendering it uninsured within meaning of uninsured motorist coverage, 17 ALR4th 1322.

Uninsured motorist endorsement: validity and enforceability of policy provision purporting to authorize deduction of no-fault benefits from amounts payable under uninsured motorist endorsement, 20 ALR4th 1104.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in policies issued by different insurers to same insured, 21 ALR4th 211.

Fact that passenger in vehicle is owner as affecting right to recover from driver for injuries to, or death of, passenger incurred in consequence of driver's negligence, 21 ALR4th 459.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in single policy applicable to different vehicles of individual insured, 23 ALR4th 12.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in separate policies issued by same insurer to different insureds, 23 ALR4th 108.

Recoverability, under uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, of deficiencies in compensation afforded injured party by tortfeasor's liability coverage, 24 ALR4th 13.

Right to recover under uninsured or underinsured motorist insurance for injuries attributable to joint tortfeasors, one of whom is insured, 24 ALR4th 63.

Validity, construction and effect of “consent to sue” clauses in uninsured motorist endorsement of automobile insurance policy, 24 ALR4th 1024.

Combining or “stacking” uninsured motorist coverages provided in separate policies issued by same insurer to same insured, 25 ALR4th 6.

Uninsured motorist coverage: validity of exclusion of injuries sustained by insured while occupying “owned” vehicle not insured by policy, 30 ALR4th 172.

Who is a “spouse” within clause of automobile liability, uninsured motorist or no-fault insurance policy defining additional insured, 36 ALR4th 588.

Right of liability insurer or uninsured motorist insurer to invoke defense based on insured's tort immunity arising out of marital or other close family relationship to injured party, 36 ALR4th 747.

Automobile fire, theft and collision insurance: insurable interest in stolen motor vehicle, 38 ALR4th 538.

Construction and application of “automatic insurance” or “newly-acquired vehicle” clause (“replacement,” and “blanket,” or “fleet” provisions) contained in automobile liability policy, 39 ALR4th 229.

Uninsured motorist insurance: injuries to motorcyclist as within affirmative or exclusionary terms of automobile insurance policy, 46 ALR4th 771.

“Excess” or “umbrella” insurance policy as providing coverage for accidents with uninsured or underinsured motorists 2 ALR5th 922.

Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage: enforceability of policy provision limiting appeals from arbitration, 23 ALR5th 801.

Requirement that multicoverage umbrella insurance policy offer uninsured- or underinsured-motorist coverage equal to liability limits under umbrella provisions, 52 ALR5th 451.

Validity of territorial restrictions on uninsured/underinsured coverage in automobile insurance policies, 55 ALR5th 747.

Who is “member” or “resident” of same “family” or “household” within no-fault or uninsured motorist provisions of motor vehicle insurance policy, 66 ALR5th 269.

Uninsured motorist indorsement: construction and application of requirement that there be “physical contact” with unidentified or hit-and-run vehicle; “miss-and-run” cases, 77 ALR5th 319.

Uninsured motorist indorsement: general issues regarding requirement that there be “physical contact” with unidentified or hit-and-run vehicle, 78 ALR5th 341.

Uninsured motorist indorsement: construction and application of requirement that there be “physical contact” with unidentified or hit-and-run vehicle; “hit-and-run” cases, 79 ALR5th 289.

§ 31-10-102.
Scope of term “uninsured motor vehicle”.

For the purpose of coverage under W.S.

31-10-101

, the term “uninsured motor vehicle”, subject to the terms and conditions of the coverage, includes an insured motor vehicle where the liability insurer thereof is unable to make payment with respect to the legal liability of its insured within the limits specified therein because of insolvency.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 81, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 31-315.2; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Applicability. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

31-10-101

and -102 unambiguously did not require the insured to obtain, or insurers to provide, underinsured motorist liability coverage; the insurer's policy did not contain such coverage, and disallowed changes in its terms, and the policy could not be reformed to provide such coverage.
Broderick v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 2012 WY 22, 270 P.3d 684,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2012).

Stated

in

Morgan v. State, 708 P.2d 1244,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 606

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Motorist having “no-fault” insurance affording no liability coverage in circumstances as “uninsured” or “underinsured” motorist under damaged party's insurance, 40 ALR4th 1202.

Automobile insurance coverage for drive-by shootings and other incidents involving the intentional discharge of firearms from moving motor vehicles, 41 ALR5th 91.

No-fault insurance coverage for injury or death of insured occurring during carjacking or attempted carjacking, 42 ALR5th 727.

Validity, construction, and application of exclusion of government vehicles from uninsured motorist provision, 58 ALR5th 511.

Automobile insurance: what constitutes “occupying” under owned vehicle exclusion of uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage of automobile insurance policy, 59 ALR5th 191.

§ 31-10-103.
Insolvency protection.

The insolvency protection afforded by W.S.

31-10-102

is applicable only to accidents occurring during the policy period in which the uninsured motor vehicle coverage is in effect. Any insurer may provide insolvency protection under terms and conditions more favorable to its insureds than is provided under W.S.

31-10-101

through

31-10-104

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 81, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 31-315.3; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-10-104.
Subrogation.

In the event of payment to an insured under the coverage required by W.S.

31-10-101

through

31-10-104

and subject to the terms and conditions of the coverage, the insurer making the payments is entitled to the proceeds of any settlement or judgment resulting from the exercise of any rights of recovery of the insured against any person or organization legally responsible for the bodily injury or death for which the payment is made, including the proceeds recoverable from the assets of the insolvent insurer. Whenever an insurer makes payment under the coverage required by this section which is occasioned by an insolvency, the insurer’s right of recovery or reimbursement shall not include any rights against the insured of the insolvent insurer, but the paying insurer may proceed directly against the insolvent insurer or its receiver, and in pursuance of this right the paying insurer shall possess any rights which the insured of the insolvent company might otherwise have had, if the insured of the insolvent insurer had personally made payment.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 81, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 31-315.4; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.